District of Columbia statutes.
2-1223.05

Board of Directors — establishment; powers; membership; terms; delegation; compensation

Repealed.

Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-219, § 105, 51 DCR 9142
Mar. 17, 2005, D.C. Law 15-257, § 3(a)(3), 52 DCR 1161
Sept. 14, 2005, D.C. Law 16-19, § 2(a), 52 DCR 6572
Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-138, § 104(a), 55 DCR 1689
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of the Anacostia Waterfront Corporation Board Expansion Temporary Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-343, Apr. 12, 2005, law notification 52 DCR 5408).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 105 of Anacostia Waterfront Corporation Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-586, November 1, 2004, 51 DCR 10681).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see §§ 2(a), 3(a) of Anacostia Waterfront Corporation Board Expansion Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-723, January 19, 2005, 52 DCR 1943).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(c) of Anacostia Waterfront Corporation Clarification Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-64, April 20, 2005, 52 DCR 4135).